Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1541
Litter, defined.

Litter shall mean all waste material susceptible to being dropped, deposited, discarded, or otherwise disposed of by any person upon any property in the state, but not including the wastes of primary processes of farming or manufacturing. Waste material as used in this section shall mean any material appearing in a place or in a context not associated with that material's function or origin.

Laws 1979, LB 120, § 8;

Laws 1981, LB 253, § 3.
September 30, 2025